Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2501
Incentive payments for road purposes; priority.

Before distributing the February portion of funds under sections 39-2508 and 66-4,148, incentive payments shall first be made as provided in sections 39-2502 to 39-2505.

Laws 1969, c. 315, § 1, p. 1133;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 39;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 12.